District of Columbia statutes.
29-302.04

Liability for preincorporation transactions.

All persons purporting to act as or on behalf of a corporation, knowing there was no incorporation under this chapter, shall be jointly and severally liable for all liabilities created while so acting.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720